Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1049.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1553(a), (b) introductory paragraph, (1), (2) and (3), (c), (d) introductory paragraph, (2) and (4), (e)(1)(ii), (v) and (vi) and (2) and (f)(1) of Title 64 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended, subsection (d) is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1553. Second Stage Loan Program.(a) Establishment.--There is established a program to be known as the Second Stage Loan Program. The program shall provide loan guarantees to [commercial lending institutions] eligible applicants that make loans to life sciences, advanced technology or manufacturing businesses located within this 123456789101112131415161718 Commonwealth.(b) Application for enrollment.--[A commercial lending institution] An eligible applicant may apply for enrollment in the program authorized by this section. The application shall be on the form prescribed by the board and shall include or demonstrate all of the following:(1) The name and address of the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant and the name and title of the individual who will serve as the point of contact for the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant.(2) A statement defining the service area of the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant.(3) A statement describing the commercial lending activities engaged in by the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant and how the [institution] eligible applicant intends to expand those activities as a result of its participation in the program authorized by this section.* * *(c) Enrollment approval.--Upon being satisfied that all requirements have been met, the board may enroll the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant in the program authorized by this section, and, if enrolled, the authority shall execute a master guarantee agreement in favor of the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant. In addition to any other terms and conditions required by the board, the master guarantee agreement shall provide for the following:(1) The procedure for the submission of a claim for payment by the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant. This procedure shall require that the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant demonstrate that it 20250HB1049PN1139 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has exhausted all available remedies against the borrower, other guarantors and collateral for the loan before seeking payment under the agreement.(2) A requirement that a percentage of any moneys recovered by the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant subsequent to any payment made under the master guarantee agreement by the authority be remitted to the authority.(3) Periodic reporting requirements by the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant regarding itself and regarding the loans for which guarantee certificates have been issued under this section.(d) Application for guarantee.--[A commercial lending institution] An eligible applicant enrolled in the program authorized by this section may submit an application to the authority for the guarantee of a proposed loan. The application shall be on the form prescribed by the board and shall include or demonstrate all of the following:* * *[(2) The number of projected new or retained employees of the borrower as a result of the loan.](2.1) A statement demonstrating that the use of the loan proceeds by the borrower will result in jobs being created or retained within this Commonwealth and an estimate of the number of projected new or retained employees as a result of the loan.(2.2) A statement demonstrating that the borrower's business is located within the eligible applicant's service area within this Commonwealth.* * *20250HB1049PN1139 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A statement describing the purpose of the loan, the requested amount of the loan, a copy of the [commercial lending institution's] eligible applicant's commitment letter and applicable credit underwriting that supports the repayment of the loan, as well as the collateral and other guarantees offered by the borrower to support the loan.* * *(e) Application review.--(1) The board shall review the application to determine all of the following:* * *(ii) That the borrower's business has been in existence for at least two years [but no more than seven years] at the time of application.* * *(v) That the borrower's business is located within the [commercial lending institution's] eligible applicant's service area and within this Commonwealth.(vi) That the borrower and the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant have met all other requirements established by the board.(2) Upon being satisfied that all requirements have been met, the board may approve the guarantee, and, if approved, the authority shall issue a guarantee certificate for the loan to the [commercial lending institution] eligible applicant stating the terms and amount of the guarantee.* * *(f) Limitations.--(1) [During the first two years of the term of a loan for which a guarantee certificate has been issued, the 20250HB1049PN1139 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guarantee may not exceed 50% of the outstanding principal amount of the loan. From the end of year two through either the end of year seven or the end of the term of the loan, whichever occurs first, the guarantee may not exceed 25% of the outstanding principal amount of the loan. The guarantee will] The authority shall determine the maximum guarantee based on a percentage of the outstanding principal amount of the loan. The guarantee shall terminate at the end of seven years.* * *(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified economic development organization." As defined in section 1102 (relating to definitions)."Eligible applicant." A commercial lending institution, community development financial institution or certified economic development organization.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1049PN1139 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819